Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB218.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 303 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 303. Classes of Income.--* * *(a.13) An amount of a premium paid for mortgage insurance shall be deductible from taxable income on the annual personal income tax return. The deduction shall not result in taxable income being less than zero. For the purposes of this subsection, the term "mortgage insurance" means insurance, including mortgage guaranty insurance, against the nonpayment 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 of, or default on, an individual mortgage or loan involved in a residential mortgage transaction.* * *Section 2. The addition of section 303(a.13) of the act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0218PN0175 - 2 - 123456